Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-919
Relationship to federal rules.

Irrespective of whether a licensee is subject to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act privacy rule as promulgated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, if a licensee complies with all requirements of the federal rule except for its effective date provision, the licensee shall not be subject to the provisions of sections 44-916 to 44-920.

Laws 2001, LB 52, § 19.